Vermont, session 2025-2026, H442.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 123 is amended to read:
§ 123. DUTIES OF OFFICE
(a) The Office shall provide administrative, secretarial, financial,
investigatory, inspection, and legal services to the boards. The services
provided by the Office shall include:
VT LEG #380862 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.442
2025 Page 2 of 2
* * *
(14) Providing a process for the expedited issuance of licenses for any
applicant who:
(A) has exclusively practiced in a jurisdiction that does not similarly
license the profession for which the applicant is applying for a license in this
State;
(B) has practiced that profession uninterrupted for the prior three
years; and
(C) otherwise meets the Office’s qualifications and criminal
requirements for licensure.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380862 v.1